Maryland, session 2026, HB0602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
SUBTITLE 6. BALTIMORE COUNTY TRANSFER TAX.
13–601.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “FIRST–TIME MARYLAND HOME BUYER” MEANS AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS NEVER OWNED IN THE STATE RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY
THAT HAS BEEN THE INDIVIDUAL’S PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE.
13–602.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0602*

HOUSE BILL 602
(A) IF THERE ARE TWO OR MORE GRANTEES, THIS SECTION DOES NOT
APPLY UNLESS EACH GRANTEE IS A FIRST–TIME MARYLAND HOME BUYER OR A
CO–MAKER OR GUARANTOR OF A PURCHASE MONEY MORTGAGE OR PURCHASE
MONEY DEED OF TRUST AS DEFINED IN § 12–108(I) OF THIS ARTICLE FOR THE
PROPERTY AND THE CO–MAKER OR GUARANTOR WILL NOT OCCUPY THE RESIDENCE
AS THE CO–MAKER’S OR GUARANTOR’S PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE.
(B) AN INSTRUMENT OF WRITING THAT TRANSFERS IMPROVED
RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY TO A FIRST–TIME MARYLAND HOME BUYER WHO
WILL OCCUPY THE PROPERTY AS A PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE
BALTIMORE COUNTY TRANSFER TAX.
(C) TO QUALIFY FOR THE EXEMPTION UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, EACH GRANTEE OR AGENT OF THE GRANTEE SHALL PROVIDE A
STATEMENT THAT IS SIGNED UNDER OATH BY THE GRANTEE OR AGENT OF THE
GRANTEE STATING THAT:
(1) (I) THE GRANTEE IS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS NEVER OWNED IN
THE STATE RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY THAT HAS BEEN THE INDIVIDUAL’S
PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE; AND
(II) THE RESIDENCE WILL BE OCCUPIED BY THE GRANTEE AS
THE GRANTEE’S PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE; OR
(2) (I) THE GRANTEE IS A CO–MAKER OR GUARANTOR OF A
PURCHASE MONEY MORTGAGE OR PURCHASE MONEY DEED OF TRUST AS DEFINED
IN § 12–108(I) OF THIS ARTICLE FOR THE PROPERTY; AND
(II) THE GRANTEE WILL NOT OCCUPY THE RESIDENCE AS THE
CO–MAKER’S OR GUARANTOR’S PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE.
(D) A STATEMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION BY AN AGENT
OF A GRANTEE SHALL STATE THAT THE STATEMENT:
(1) IS BASED ON A DILIGENT INQUIRY MADE BY THE AGENT WITH
RESPECT TO THE FACTS SET FORTH IN THE STATEMENT; AND
(2) IS TRUE TO THE BEST OF THE KNOWLEDGE, INFORMATION, AND
BELIEF OF THE AGENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.